Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6039.01
Paid dining
assistant; qualifications.

No person shall act
as a paid dining assistant in a nursing home unless such person:

(1) Is at least sixteen years of age;

(2) Is able to speak and understand the English language
or a language understood by the nursing home resident being fed by such person;

(3) Has successfully completed at least eight hours of training
as prescribed by the department for paid dining assistants;

(4) Has no adverse findings on the Nurse Aide Registry or
the Adult Protective Services Central Registry; and

(5) Has no adverse findings on the central registry created
in section 28-718 if the nursing home which employs such person as a paid
dining assistant has at any one time more than one resident under the age
of nineteen years.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 115;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 47.